Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1001.5 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any county of this state is hereby authorized to levy a tax
upon the severance of rock, gravel, granite, sand, limestone or any
other natural materials mined for purposes of producing aggregate
within the territorial limits of the county by any lawfully
recognized for-profit business entity in an amount specified in the
special election called as provided herein.
B. No severance tax shall be applicable to aggregates extracted
by an individual person or persons from real property owned by such
person or persons and not sold for profit.
C. No severance tax shall be applicable to limestone extracted
for agricultural purposes.
D. Before a severance tax may be levied by the county, the
imposition of the tax shall first be approved by a majority of the
registered voters of the county voting thereon at a special election
called by the board of county commissioners or by an initiative
petition signed by not less than five percent (5%) of the registered
voters of the county who were registered at the time of the last
general election. The question submitted shall be limited to the
purposes described by subsection G of this section. However, if a
majority of the registered voters of a county voting fail to approve
Req. No. 13859 Page 2

such a tax, the board of county commissioners shall not call another
special election for such purpose for six (6) months.
E. Any tax levied or any change in the rate of a tax levied
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall become effective on
the first day of the calendar quarter following approval by the
voters of the county unless another effective date, which shall also
be on the first day of a calendar quarter, is specified in the
ordinance or resolution levying the tax or changing the rate of the
tax. The county may approve a severance tax up to fifteen cents
($0.15) per ton on the production of rock, gravel, granite, sand and
limestone.
F. Any severance tax which may be levied by a county shall be
designated for a specific or general purpose by a majority vote of
the board of county commissioners or as stated by initiative
petition. The county shall identify the purpose of the severance
tax when it is presented to the voters pursuant to the provisions of
subsection A of this section.
G. Except as provided by Section 2 of this act, the proceeds of
any severance tax levied by a county shall be deposited in the
county general fund and shall be used for any roads and bridges but
shall not be used for salaries or other forms of employee
compensation and may only be used for construction or improvement of
roads and bridges.
Req. No. 13859 Page 3

H. The life of a tax levied pursuant to the provisions of this
section may be limited or unlimited in duration. The county shall
identify the duration of the tax when it is presented to the voters
pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section.
I. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall give notice to all
relevant taxpayers of a rate change at least sixty (60) days prior
to the effective date of the rate change. Failure to give notice as
required by this section shall delay the effective date of the rate
change to the first day of the next calendar quarter. The board of
county commissioners of a county levying a tax pursuant to the
provisions of this section and the Tax Commission are authorized to
enter into a contract whereby the Tax Commission shall have
authority to assess, collect and enforce the tax and any penalties
or interest thereon levied by the county and to remit the same to
the county. Such authority shall apply to any tax levied pursuant
to this section and penalty or interest liability existing at the
time of contracting. Upon contracting, the Tax Commission shall
have the power of enforcement of the tax, penalties or interest that
are vested in the county. The contract shall provide for the
assessment, collection and enforcement of the tax, penalties or
interest in the same manner as the administration, collection or
enforcement of the state gross production tax by the Tax Commission.
For providing such assistance, the Tax Commission shall charge the
Req. No. 13859 Page 4

county a fee of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) of the gross
collection proceeds.
J. Initiative petitions calling for a special election
concerning county severance tax proposals shall be in accordance
with Sections 2, 3, 3.1, 6, 18 and 24 of Title 34 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. Petitions shall be submitted to the office of the county
clerk for approval as to form prior to circulation. Following
approval, the petitioner shall have ninety (90) days to secure the
required signatures. After securing the requisite number of
signatures, the petitioner shall submit the petition and signatures
to the county clerk. Following the verification of signatures, the
county clerk shall present the petition to the board of county
commissioners. The special election shall be held within sixty (60)
days of the board of county commissioners receiving the petition
from the county clerk.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1001.6 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. All materials sold where an appropriate county sales tax was
charged, collected and remitted to the county where the materials
were severed shall receive a credit against the severance tax in the
same amount of the sales tax portion that was remitted to the county
of origin.
Req. No. 13859 Page 5

B. All materials sold to a tax-exempt entity where no sales tax
is collected shall be subject to the severance tax.
C. If the mining or extracting of aggregates takes place within
the incorporated area of a municipality, fifty percent (50%) of the
revenue derived from the mining or extracting of aggregates which
occurs within such incorporated municipal area from a severance tax
levy imposed by a county pursuant to Section 1 of this act shall be
apportioned to the general revenue fund of the municipality and
fifty percent (50%) of the revenue shall be apportioned to the
county as provided by subsection F of Section 1 of this act.
D. No county that receives revenue from a severance tax levy on
aggregates as authorized by this act shall impose any fee, charge,
assessment or other cost for the privilege of engaging in the mining
or extraction of aggregates.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
60-2-13859 MAH 01/05/26
Req. No. 13859 Page 6